Wyoming statutes. Title 7 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 5 Grand Jury

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

38 Am. Jur. 2d Grand Jury § 1 et seq.

Who are “government personnel” within meaning of Rule 6(e)(3)(A)(ii) of the Federal Rules of Criminal Procedure to whom matters occurring before grand jury may be disclosed, 54 ALR Fed 805.

Civil liability of witness in action under 42 USC § 1983 for deprivation of civil rights, based on testimony given at pretrial criminal proceeding, 94 ALR Fed 892.

Propriety of blanket or per se rule prohibiting federal grand jury from indicting witness who has previously testified before same grand jury under grant of use immunity, 139 ALR Fed 489.

23 C.J.S. Criminal Law § 930; 38A C.J.S. Grand Juries § 1 et seq.